vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện bộ cảm biến và dụng cụ đo: Phụ kiện dụng cụ thử điện; Phụ kiện thiết bị rò gas; Phụ kiện cân đo; Phụ kiện đo vi lượng; Phụ kiện đồng hồ vạn năng
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství pro měřicí nástroje a přístroje: Příslušenství k elektrickým zkoušečkám; Příslušenství k detektorům plynu; Příslušenství pro váhy; Mikrometry - příslušenství; Příslušenství k multimetrům
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo pre meracie prístroje a snímače: Príslušenstvo pre elektrické testovacie nástroje; Príslušenstvo pre detektory plynu; Príslušenstvo pre meracie váhy; Príslušenstvo pre mikrometre; Príslušenstvo pre multimetre
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Måleværktøj og -sensor – tilbehør: Metal- og spændingsmåler – tilbehør; Gasdetektor – tilbehør; Tilbehør til vægte; Tilbehør til mikrometre; Tilbehør til multimetre
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za merilna orodja in senzorje: Dodatki za električna testna orodja; Dodatki za detektorje plinov; Dodatki za merilne tehtnice; Dodatki za mikrometre; Dodatki za multimetre
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para sensores y herramientas de medición: Accesorios para herramientas de mediciones eléctricas; Accesorios para detectores de gas; Accesorios para pesos; Accesorios para micrómetros; Accesorios para multímetros
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do narzędzi pomiarowych i czujników: Akcesoria do wykrywaczy metalu i napięcia; Akcesoria do wykrywaczy gazu; Akcesoria do skal pomiarowych; Akcesoria do mikrometrów; Akcesoria do multimetrów
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 측정 도구/센서 부대용품: 전기 테스트 도구 부대용품; 가스 감지기 부대용품; 저울 부대용품; 마이크로미터 부대용품; 멀티미터 부대용품
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือวัดและอุปกรณ์เซ็นเซอร์: อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือทดสอบทางไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์ตรวจจับแก๊ส; อุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องชั่งน้ำหนัก; อุปกรณ์เสริมของไมโครมิเตอร์; อุปกรณ์มาตรวัดอเนกประสงค์
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Mittatyökalujen ja antureiden lisätarvikkeet: Sähköisten testaustyökalujen lisätarvikkeet; Kaasuilmaisimen lisätarvikkeet; Mittaustarvikkeet; Mikrometrien tarvikkeet; Yleismittarin tarvikkeet
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Zubehör für Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber: Zubehör für Spannungsmesser; Zubehör für Gasdetektoren; Zubehör für Messskalen; Mikrometer-Zubehör; Multimeter-Zubehör
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør til måleverktøyer og sensorer: Tilbehør til elektriske testverktøy; Tilbehør til gassdetektorer; Tilbehør til målevekter; Mikrometertilbehør; Tilbehør til multimetere
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Измервателни инструменти и аксесоари за сензори: Аксесоари за инструменти за тестване на електричество; Аксесоари за газови детектори; Аксесоари за измервателни везни; Аксесоари за микрометър; Аксесоари за мултицет
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Ferramentas de medição e acessórios de sensores: Acessórios de ferramentas de teste elétricas; Acessórios de detetor de gás; Acessórios de balança; Acessórios de micrómetro; Acessórios de multímetro
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > 測定機器・センサー関連用品: 電気計器関連用品; ガス検知器関連用品; 秤関連用品; マイクロメーター関連用品; マルチメーター関連用品
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za mjerni alat i senzore: Pribor za alate za električna ispitivanja; Pribor za detektore plina; Pribor za mjerne vage; Pribor za mikrometre; Pribor za multimetre
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 测量工具与传感器配件: 电气测试工具配件; 气体探测器配件; 秤配件; 千分尺配件; 万用表配件
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour outils de mesure et détecteurs: Accessoires pour outils de test électrique; Accessoires pour détecteurs de gaz; Accessoires pour balances; Accessoires pour micromètres; Accessoires pour multimètres
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori strumenti/sensori misurazione: Accessori per rilevatori di tensione; Accessori gas detector; Accessori per scale di misurazione; Accessori per micrometri; Accessori per misuratori di tensione
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Measuring Tool & Sensor Accessories: Electrical Testing Tool Accessories; Gas Detector Accessories; Measuring Scale Accessories; Micrometer Accessories; Multimeter Accessories
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ για εργαλεία μέτρησης & αισθητήρες: Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρικών εργαλείων ελέγχου; Αξεσουάρ ανιχνευτών αερίου; Αξεσουάρ κλίμακας μέτρησης; Αξεσουάρ μικρομέτρων; Αξεσουάρ πολυμέτρων
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru instrumente de măsură și senzori: Accesorii pentru instrumente de testare electrică; Accesorii pentru detectoare de gaz; Accesorii pentru cântare; Accesorii pentru micrometre; Accesorii pentru multimetre
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para ferramentas de medida e sensores: Acessórios para ferramentas de teste elétrico; Acessórios para detector de gás; Acessórios para medição de escala; Acessórios para micrômetros; Acessórios para multímetro
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Matavimo įrankių ir jutiklių priedai: Elektros testavimo įrankių priedai; Dujų detektorių priedai; Svarstyklių priedai; Mikrometrų priedai; Multimetrų priedai
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 測量工具和感測器配件: 電子檢測工具配件; 氣敏傳感器配件; 秤重計配件; 千分尺配件; 萬用表配件
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Mérőeszköz- és érzékelőkiegészítők: Elektromosvizsgálóeszköz-kiegészítők; Gázérzékelő-kiegészítők; Mérőskála-kiegészítők; Mikrométer-kiegészítők; Multiméter-kiegészítők
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для измерительных инструментов и датчиков: Аксессуары для электроизмерительных приборов; Аксессуары для детекторов газов; Аксессуары для весов; Аксессуары для микрометров; Аксессуары для мультиметров
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Ölçüm Aleti ve Sensör Aksesuarları: Elektrik Testi Aracı Aksesuarları; Gaz Dedektörü Aksesuarları; Ölçüm Aleti Aksesuarları; Mikrometre Aksesuarları; Multimetre Aksesuarları
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Accessoires voor meethulpmiddelen en sensoren: Accessoires voor metaal- en voltdetectoren; Accessoires voor gasdetectors; Accessoires voor weegschalen; Accessoires voor micrometers; Accessoires voor multimeters
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till mätverktyg och sensorer: Tillbehör till elströmstestare; Tillbehör till gasdetektorer; Tillbehör till vågar; Tillbehör till mikrometrar; Multimetertillbehör